Tennessee, session 114, HB2230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-3-103(21), is amended by
deleting "fee or charge" and substituting instead "fee or charge, including a toll,".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-3-104(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) Existing transportation facilities that are part of the state highway system or
interstate and national defense highway system, located at the border of this state with
another state, and where, on or after July 1, 2026:
(A) One (1) or more new vehicle travel lanes are added to the facility; or
(B) An HOV lane on the facility is converted to a high occupancy user fee
lane.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2230
012594
- 1 -